Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3440
Review team; duties.

The suicide mortality review team shall:

(1) Develop a suicide mortalities data collection system;

(2) Conduct an annual analysis of the incidences and causes of suicides in this state during the preceding fiscal year;

(3) Develop protocols for suicide investigations, including protocols for law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, medical examiners, health care facilities, and social service agencies;

(4) Study the adequacy of statutes, ordinances, rules, training, and services to determine the changes required to decrease the incidence of preventable suicides and, as appropriate, take steps to implement these changes;

(5) Educate the public regarding the incidences and causes of suicide and the public's role in preventing these deaths; and

(6) Designate a member of the suicide mortality review team to serve as chairperson.

Laws 2025, LB414, § 3.